Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2171.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5329XS (2) 91 lh/ns S.F. 2171 Section 1. Section 602.10102, Code 2026, is amended to read 1 as follows: 2 602.10102 Qualifications for admission. 3 1. Every applicant for such admission shall be a person 4 of honesty, integrity, trustworthiness, and truthfulness , and 5 one who appreciates and will adhere to a code of conduct for 6 lawyers as adopted by the supreme court. The applicant shall 7 have actually done one of the following: 8 a. Actually and in good faith pursued a regular course of 9 study of the law and shall have graduated from some reputable 10 law school. 11 b. Worked as an employee of the general assembly with a 12 combined ten years of experience in legislative research or 13 analysis or as a member of the general assembly. 14 2. The application form shall not contain a recent 15 photograph of the applicant. An applicant shall not be 16 ineligible for registration because of age, citizenship, sex, 17 race, religion, marital status , or national origin , although 18 the application form may require citizenship information. 19 The board may consider the past record of guilty pleas and 20 convictions of public offenses of an applicant. Character 21 references may be required; however, such references shall not 22 be restricted to lawyers. 23